District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0366.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Flexible Rent Subsidy Program Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 31c of the Homeless Services Reform Act of 2005, effective October 8,
2016 (D.C. Law 21-160; D.C. Official Code § 4-756.05), is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 31c. Flexible rent subsidy program.


“(a) The Department shall establish a Flexible Rent Subsidy Program (the “Program”) to
subsidize the cost of monthly rent for individuals and families (“participants”) that are homeless
or at risk of experiencing homelessness to support achieving stability in permanent housing.
“(b) The Department shall provide a subsidy to each participant via dedicated account,
which shall be used solely to pay the individual's or family's monthly rent.
“(c) The annual subsidy for a participant shall be less than the maximum annual amount
that may be provided to a household by voucher under section 26c of the District of Columbia
Housing Authority Act of 1999, effective March 2, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-192; D.C. Official Code §
6-228). All individuals awarded a subsidy in the same fiscal year shall receive the same subsidy
amount. All families awarded a subsidy in the same fiscal year shall receive the same subsidy
amount.
“(d) For households approved to join the Program after October 1, 2027, the amount of the
annual subsidy for a family shall not be less than $11,300, and the amount of the annual subsidy
for an individual shall not be less than $9,000.
“(e) For households approved to join the Program before October 1, 2027, the amount of
the annual subsidy for a family shall not be less than $9,600, and the amount of the annual subsidy
for an individual shall not be less than $8,280.
“(f) The amount of a participant’s subsidy shall not be reduced unless the participant is
exited from the Program under section 22b, terminated from the Program under section 22, or
suspended from the Program under section 21.
“(g) To be eligible for initial enrollment in the Program, an individual or family must:
“(1) Be a Resident of the District;


“(2) Have a total annual income less than or equal to 40% of the Median Family
Income for the District for the relevant household size;
“(3) Be found by the Department to have sufficient income, or the potential to grow
income, such that enrollment in the Program would end or prevent an episode of homelessness;
and
“(4)(A) Be homeless;
“(B) Be at risk of homelessness; or
“(C) Have applied for at least one government-funded emergency or
temporary housing or rental assistance program administered by or in the District, including the
Emergency Rental Assistance Program, the Homelessness Prevention Program, the Family Re-
Housing and Stabilization Program, or another rapid re-housing program, within the 48 months
immediately preceding the individual or family’s application for the Program.
“(h) The Department shall require Program participants to certify their continued eligibility
for the Program no more frequently than on an annual basis. To remain eligible for continued
participation in the Program, an individual or family must, at the time of recertification:
“(1) Be a Resident of the District; and
“(2) Have a total annual income less than or equal to 60% of the Median Family
Income for the District for the relevant household size.
“(i) The Program shall be a “housing program” exits from which are governed by section
22b.
“(j) An individual or family may be enrolled in a government-funded rental assistance
program administered by the District at the time of applying for the Program.
“(k) No individual, family, or individual member of a family may be enrolled in both the


Program and another ongoing District- or federal government-funded rental assistance program at
the same time. The receipt of Emergency Rental Assistance Funds under section 8f does not
constitute enrollment in an ongoing rental assistance program under this subsection.
“(l) Participation in the Program shall not preclude the receipt of shelter or rental assistance
after participation in the Program has ended or the receipt of shelter assistance during participation
in the Program.
“(m) The Mayor, under subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issues rules to implement
the provisions of this section, including rules establishing the dollar amount of the maximum
annual subsidy and the terms of program administration. The Mayor may establish Program time
limits no shorter than five years through rule.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (12 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
100 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
101 Mayor, action by the Council overriding the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review as
102 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
103 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).